test/src/gt-desc-yamls/N-katwq11_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - katõq: # Noun (11) katõq 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     katõq+N+Sg+Nom: katõq
     katõq+N+Sg+Gen: kattõ
     katõq+N+Sg+Par: katõt
     katõq+N+Sg+Ill: [kattõhe, kattõdõ]
     katõq+N+Sg+Ine: [kattõn, kattõh, kattõhn]
     katõq+N+Sg+Ela: kattõst
     katõq+N+Sg+All: kattõlõ
     katõq+N+Sg+Ade: kattõl
     katõq+N+Sg+Abl: kattõlt
     katõq+N+Sg+Tra: kattõs
     katõq+N+Sg+Ter: kattõniq
     katõq+N+Sg+Abe: kattõldaq
     katõq+N+Sg+Com: kattõgaq
     katõq+N+Pl+Nom: kattõq
     katõq+N+Pl+Gen: [kattidõ, kattiidõ, katõtõ]
     katõq+N+Pl+Par: [kattit, kattiid]
     katõq+N+Pl+Ill: [kattihe, kattiihe, katõtõhe, kattidõ, kattiidõ, katõtõdõ]
     katõq+N+Pl+Ine: [kattin, kattih, kattihn, kattiin, kattiih, kattiihn, katõtõn, katõtõh, katõtõhn]
     katõq+N+Pl+Ela: [kattist, kattiist, katõtõst]
     katõq+N+Pl+All: [kattilõ, kattiilõ, katõtõlõ]
     katõq+N+Pl+Ade: [kattil, kattiil, katõtõl]
     katõq+N+Pl+Abl: [kattilt, kattiilt, katõtõlt]
     katõq+N+Pl+Tra: [kattis, kattiis, katõtõs]
     katõq+N+Pl+Ter: [kattiniq, kattiiniq, katõtõniq]
     katõq+N+Pl+Abe: [kattildaq, kattiildaq, katõtõldaq]
     katõq+N+Pl+Com: [kattidõgaq, kattiidõgaq, katõtõgaq]
